Utah statutes.
31A-38-104.   Authorization -- Money transferred for reserves.

(1)  The Department of Workforce Services may:

(a)  convert the bridge program to the state program through any of the following, or combination of the following, that the Department of Workforce Services considers best serves the needs of qualified participants:

(i)  a contract with a licensed insurance company authorized to do business in the state;

(ii)  through any other arrangement acceptable under the Trade Reform Act; or

(iii)  a self-insurance program through a third party administrator as provided in Subsection 31A-38-103(3)(b)(ii); and

(b)  obligate up to $2,000,000 of the Special Administrative Expense Account created in Section 35A-4-506 as reserves for the state program.

(2)  The money in Subsection (1)(b) may be used until the reserves in the state program become adequate.

